Georgia, session 2025_26, HB394.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 4 of Title 34 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to minimum wage
law, is amended in Code Section 34-4-3, relating to amount of minimum wage to be paid by
employers and employers and employees covered by the chapter, by revising subsection (a)
as follows:
"(a) Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, every employer, whether a person,
firm, or corporation, shall pay to all covered employees a minimum wage which shall be
not less than $5.15 $15.00 per hour for each hour worked in the employment of such
employer."
H. B. 394
- 1 -

LC 52 0730
SECTION 2.
Said chapter is further amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"34-4-3.2.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Eligible full-time state employee' means a full-time state employee who is paid on
an hourly basis for actual hours worked.
(2) 'Full-time state employee' means an individual who works at least 30 hours per week,
whose employment is intended to be continuing in nature, and who receives his or her
compensation in a direct payment from a state agency.
(3) 'State agency' means any department, agency, commission, or any other institution
of the executive, judicial, or legislative branches of the government of this state. Such
term shall not include the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia.
(b) Beginning January 1, 2026, all eligible full-time state employees shall be paid a
minimum wage of not less than $15.00 per hour."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 394
- 2 -